South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S1005.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Judicial salaries revised SECTION 1.    Section 14-1-200 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 14-1-200.    The General Assembly shall establish the salary of the Chief Justice and Associate Justices of the Supreme Court in the annual general appropriation act with the salary of the Chief Justice to be one hundred five percent of the salary fixed for Associate Justices of the Supreme Court and shall fix the salaries for the court of appeals, circuit court, and family court according to the following schedule: (1) the chief judge of the court of appeals shall receive a salary in an amount equal to ninety-nine percent of the salary fixed for Associate Justices of the Supreme Court; (2) judges of the court of appeals shall receive a salary in an amount equal to ninety-seven and one-half percent of the salary fixed for Associate Justices of the Supreme Court; (3) judges of the circuit court shall receive a salary in an amount equal to ninety-five percent of the salary fixed for Associate Justices of the Supreme Court; and (4) judges of the family court shall receive a salary in an amount equal to ninety-five percent of the salary fixed for Associate Justices of the Supreme Court. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 14th day of May, 2026. Approved the 18th day of May, 2026. __________